Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 22 Nursing Home Administrators

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to nurses generally, see chapter 21 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Licensing and regulation of nursing or rest homes, 97 ALR2d 1187.

Licensing and regulation of nursing or rest homes, 53 ALR4th 689.

Liability of nursing home for violating statutory duty to notify third party concerning patient's medical condition, 46 ALR5th 821.

§ 33-22-101.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this act [§§

33-22-101

through

33-22-110

] and as used herein:

The term “board” means the Wyoming state board of nursing home administrators hereinafter created;

The term “nursing home administrator” means a person who operates, manages, supervises, or is in charge of a nursing home.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-22-102.
Board of nursing home administrators created; composition; appointment; removal; qualifications and terms of members.

The Wyoming state board of nursing home administrators is created to consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

One (1) appointee shall hold the degree of doctor of medicine and be licensed to practice medicine in Wyoming. One (1) appointee shall be a registered nurse duly licensed to practice professional nursing in Wyoming, who is not employed by a nursing home. One (1) appointee shall be a consumer representative selected from the general public. The remaining two (2) appointees shall each be and shall each maintain employment as an operator-administrator of a nursing home within Wyoming, and have two (2) years’ experience as a nursing home operator-administrator within Wyoming.

The terms of all appointed members shall be four (4) years. Any vacancy shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.2; Laws 1973, ch. 38, § 1; 1987, ch. 45, § 1; ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted the former last sentence of (c), which
read, “No more than three (3) members of this board shall be
from the same political party.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted the former second sentence in (a), which read, “The director of the department of health, or his designee, who is a member of a health profession concerned with the care of the chronically ill or aged patient, shall serve as an ex officio member of the board but shall not vote.”; and added “and shall each maintain employment as” in the fourth sentence of (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 33-22-103.
License; issuance; qualifications; waiver of additional qualifications.

The board shall have authority to issue licenses to qualified persons as nursing home administrators. No license shall be issued to a person as a nursing home administrator unless he shall have submitted evidence satisfactory to the board of his ability to supervise a nursing home. For purposes of carrying out this section, fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check under W.S.

7-19-201

shall be provided to the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.3; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2022 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted the last sentence which read: “Provided, that persons meeting the qualifications, who have heretofore been acknowledged by the state department of public health as administrators of nursing homes pursuant to W.S.

35-2-101

through 35-2-112, and who hold such acknowledgment on the effective date of this act, but who cannot meet any additional qualifications established by the board, may, subject to such conditions and requirements as may be prescribed by the board, be granted a waiver by the board of such qualifications for a period of two (2) years after the effective date of this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

W.S.

35-2-101

through 35-2-112, referred to in this section, were repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 2.

§ 33-22-104.
License; annual fee; expiration; continuing education.

Each person licensed as a nursing home administrator shall be required to pay an annual license fee in an amount to be fixed by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. Each such license shall expire on the thirty-first day of December following issuance, and shall be renewable for a calendar year, upon payment of the annual license fee. Application for renewal shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the board of completion of continuing education requirements as established by rule of the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.4; Laws 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “thirty-first” for “31st.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the last sentence.

§ 33-22-105.
Disposition of fees; board of nursing home administrators' account.

All fees shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall keep the same in a separate account, which may be used and expended by the board to pay the compensation and travel expenses of members and employees of the board, and other expenses necessary for the board to administer and carry out the provisions of this act [§§

33-22-101

through

33-22-110

].

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.5; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account, within the earmarked revenue fund”, and made stylistic changes.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-22-106.
Officers of board; rules and regulations; compensation of board; necessary personnel.

The board shall elect from its membership a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary-treasurer, and shall adopt rules and regulations to govern its proceedings. This board will serve without compensation except for the receipt of per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). The board may employ and fix the compensation and duties of necessary personnel to assist it in the performance of its duties.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.6; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “except for the receipt of per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “except for travel and per diem at the usual rate of other state officials” in the second sentence.

§ 33-22-107.
Determining qualifications of administrator; examinations; holder of license deemed qualified.

The board shall have sole and exclusive authority to determine the qualifications, skill and fitness of any person to serve as an administrator of a nursing home or similar institution. The board may give examinations and shall determine the subjects of examination for applicants for licensure as nursing home administrators, and the scope, content and format of such examinations which in any examination shall be the same for all candidates; provided, however, that such examinations shall include examination of the applicant to demonstrate his proficiency in the rules and regulations of health and safety. The holder of a license under the provisions of this act [§§

33-22-101

to

33-22-110

] shall be deemed qualified to serve as the administrator of a nursing home.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.7.

§ 33-22-108.
Powers and duties of board.

The board shall:

Develop, impose and enforce standards which must be met by individuals in order to receive a license as a nursing home administrator, which standards shall be designed to insure that nursing home administrators will be individuals who have backgrounds that do not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of nursing home administration or to the ability to practice nursing home administration and are otherwise suitable, and who, by training or experience, in the field of institutional administration, are qualified to serve as nursing home administrators;

Develop and apply appropriate techniques, including examinations and investigations, for determining whether an individual meets such standards;

Issue licenses to individuals determined, after application of such techniques, to meet such standards, and revoke or suspend licenses previously issued by the board in any case where the individual holding such license is determined substantially to have failed to conform to the requirements of such standards, subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

];

Conduct a continuing study and investigation of nursing homes and administrators of nursing homes within the state with a view to the improvement of the standards imposed for the licensing of such administrators and of procedures and methods for the enforcement of standards with respect to administrators of nursing homes who have been licensed as such;

Establish and carry out procedures designed to insure that individuals licensed as nursing home administrators will, during any period that they serve as such, comply with the requirements of such standards;

Receive, investigate, and take appropriate action with respect to, any charge or complaint filed with the board to the effect that any individual licensed as a nursing home administrator has failed to comply with the requirements of such standards; and

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this paragraph.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.8; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2006 amendment,

added “and” at the end of (a)(vi); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “have backgrounds that do not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of nursing home administration or to the ability to practice nursing home administration” for “are of good character” preceding “and are otherwise suitable.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-22-109.
Rules and regulations.

The board shall have the authority to make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with law as may be necessary for the proper performance of its duties, and to take such other action as may be necessary to enable the state to meet the requirements set forth in section 1908 of the Social Security Act, the federal rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and other pertinent federal authority.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.9.

Cross references. —

For the Administrative Procedure Act, see §§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Social Security Act. —

Section 1908 of the Social Security Act appears as 42 U.S.C. § 1396g.

§ 33-22-110.
Misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful and a misdemeanor for any person to act or serve in the capacity of a nursing home administrator unless he is the holder of a license as a nursing home administrator, issued in accordance with the provisions of this act [§§

33-22-101

through

33-22-110

].

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 202, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 33-291.10.

Cross references. —

For definition of misdemeanor, see §

6-10-101

.